Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-303
Offices and records; transfer; violations; penalty.

When any such county seat shall have been relocated it shall be the duty of all county officers to forthwith remove their respective offices and all county records and property in their charge to the place where said county seat shall have been relocated. Any county officer who shall refuse to comply with any of the provisions of sections 22-301 to 22-303 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor, and a conviction of any such officer of such misdemeanor shall work a vacancy in his office.

Laws 1917, c. 169, § 3, p. 381;

C.S.1922, § 847;

C.S.1929, § 25-303;

R.S.1943, § 22-303;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 82.